finished/otm.lexc
Multichar_Symbols [V] [PST] [PRS] [PRF] [PFV] [IPFV] [SG] [PL] [STEM] [1] [2] [3]

LEXICON Root
IPFV_PRS_1_Ib;
IPFV_PRS_2_Ib;
IPFV_PRS_3_Ib;
IPFV_PRS_1_III_IV;
IPFV_PRS_2_III_IV;
IPFV_PRS_3_III_IV;
IPFV_PST_13_Ib;
IPFV_PST_2_Ib;
IPFV_PST_13_III_IV;
IPFV_PST_2_III_IV;
PFV_1_II_IV;
PFV_2_II_IV;
PFV_3_II_IV;
PRF_1_II_IV;
PRF_2_II_IV;
PRF_3_III;
PRF_PL_1_II_IV;
PRF_PL_2_II_IV;
PRF_PL_3_II_IV;
IRR_1_II_IV;
IRR_2_II_IV;
IRR_3_II_IV;
IRR_1_Ib;
IRR_2_Ib;


LEXICON IPFV_PRS_1_Ib
[V][IPFV][PRS][1][SG]:dí%-n%  Ib;

LEXICON IPFV_PRS_2_Ib
[V][IPFV][PRS][2][SG]:gí%-n%  Ib;

LEXICON IPFV_PRS_3_Ib
[V][IPFV][PRS][3][SG]:i%-n%  Ib;

LEXICON IPFV_PRS_1_III_IV
[V][IPFV][PRS][1][SG]:dí%-dí%  III_IV;

LEXICON IPFV_PRS_2_III_IV
[V][IPFV][PRS][2][SG]:gí%-dí%	 III_IV;
[V][IPFV][PRS][2][SG]:gí%-dí%-n%	 III_IV_n;

LEXICON IPFV_PRS_3_III_IV
[V][IPFV][PRS][3][SG]:%(i%-%)dí%  III_IV;
[V][IPFV][PRS][3][SG]:%(i%-%)dí%-n%  III_IV_n;



LEXICON IPFV_PST_13_Ib
[V][IPFV][PST][1][SG]:mí%-n%  Ib;
[V][IPFV][PST][3][SG]:mí%-n%  Ib;

LEXICON IPFV_PST_2_Ib
[V][IPFV][PST][2][SG]:g%-mí%-n%  Ib;

LEXICON IPFV_PST_13_III_IV
[V][IPFV][PST][1][SG]:mí%-dí%  III_IV;
[V][IPFV][PST][1][SG]:mí%-dí%-n%  III_IV_n;
[V][IPFV][PST][3][SG]:mí%-dí%  III_IV;
[V][IPFV][PST][3][SG]:mí%-dí%-n%  III_IV_n;

LEXICON IPFV_PST_2_III_IV
[V][IPFV][PST][2][SG]:g%-mí%-dí%  III_IV;
[V][IPFV][PST][2][SG]:g%-mí%-dí%-n%  III_IV_n;


LEXICON PFV_1_II_IV
[V][PFV][1][SG]:dá%-n%  II_IV;

LEXICON PFV_2_II_IV
[V][PFV][2][SG]:gá%-n%  II_IV;

LEXICON PFV_3_II_IV
[V][PFV][3][SG]:bi%-n%  II_IV;


LEXICON PRF_1_II_IV
[V][PRF][1][SG]:xtá%-n%  II_IV;

LEXICON PRF_2_II_IV
[V][PRF][2][SG]:xká%-n%  II_IV;

LEXICON PRF_3_III
[V][PRF][3][SG]:xa%  III;


LEXICON PRF_PL_1_II_IV
[V][PRF][1][PL]:xtá%-n%  II_IV;

LEXICON PRF_PL_2_II_IV
[V][PRF][2][PL]:xkí%-n%  II_IV;

LEXICON PRF_PL_3_II_IV
[V][PRF][3][PL]:xí%-n%  II_IV;


LEXICON IRR_1_II_IV
[V][IRR][1][SG]:da%-n%  II_IV;

LEXICON IRR_2_II_IV
[V][IRR][2][SG]:ga%-n%  II_IV;

LEXICON IRR_3_II_IV
[V][IRR][3][SG]:di%-n%  II_IV;

LEXICON IRR_1_Ib
[V][IRR][1][SG]:ga%-n%  Ib;

LEXICON IRR_2_Ib
[V][IRR][2][SG]:gi%-n%  Ib;
